Massachusetts, session 194th, S2651.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the Massachusetts
Department of Elementary and Secondary Education shall establish a sick leave bank for Jeffrey
Yacinthe, an employee of the Department.. Any employee of the Department of Secondary and
Elementary Education may voluntarily contribute one or more sick, personal, or vacation days to
the sick leave bank for use by Jeffrey Yacinthe. If Jeffrey Yacinthe terminates employment with
the Department or requests to dissolve the sick leave bank, any remaining time in the sick leave
bank shall be transferred to the Department of Elementary and Secondary Education-paid leave
bank. Sick leave bank days shall not be used for absences unrelated to the illness or disability
that necessitated the establishment of the sick leave bank as determined by the Department.
of 1